Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Chapter 5 Life Resource Center
§ 25-5-129.
Admittance for temporary services; excepted provisions; limited duration.

The administrator may admit individuals for services temporarily pursuant to rules promulgated under W.S. 25-5-105(a) if the administrator determines a less restrictive environment is appropriate but unavailable. A client admitted for services temporarily is not subject to W.S.

25-5-114

,

25-5-115

and 25-5-121(e). No individual shall be admitted temporarily for services for more than seventy-five (75) days.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-669; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote the section.

§ 25-5-130.
Consent and notice required before major surgery; exceptions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no client shall undergo major surgery until the superintendent:

Obtains the prior consent of the client, or if his consent cannot be given knowingly, he shall obtain the prior consent of the resident’s parent or guardian; and

Notifies the parent or guardian of the nature, date and place of the surgery and the name of the surgeon. A copy of the notice shall be placed in the patient’s records.

Prior consent need not be obtained nor prior notice given when the parent or guardian cannot be located or when an emergency requires immediate surgery to prevent serious consequences or death. The parent or guardian shall be notified as soon as possible after emergency surgery.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 32; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.32; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-631; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-670; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “client” for resident” twice in (a).

§ 25-5-131.
Confidentiality of records; exceptions; penalties for violations.

All records of clients, former clients and proposed clients of the center are confidential except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, when disclosure is required by state or federal law or when disclosure is necessary to prevent imminent risk of harm to the person who is the subject of the records or others.

The administrator may provide access to the records of a client, former client or proposed client by:

The person who is the subject of the records or his guardian, guardian ad litem or attorney;

The physician or surgeon for the person who is the subject of the records;

A person authorized by the person who is the subject of the records, or by his parent or guardian if he is a minor or ward, to evaluate the person’s eligibility for admission to the center for residential services or to determine whether his residence is the most appropriate and therapeutic environment for the person;

A court, upon a showing that access to the records is necessary for the determination of an issue before it. Access under this paragraph is limited to an in camera inspection unless the court finds public disclosure is necessary;

Qualified employees of the department and the center and professional persons while in the performance of their official duties;

A person as required by law, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and the Medicaid program.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 85, § 2.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-671; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2008, ch. 85, §§ 1, 2; 2019 ch. 78, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote (a) and (b); and repealed former (c), which provided penalties for the unauthorized release of information from training school records.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(vi), deleted "the Wyoming Hospital Records and Information Act."

§ 25-5-132.
No determination of incompetency; notification of rights; deniable rights and conditions therefor; undeniable rights.

The determination that a person is eligible for admission to the center is not a determination or adjudication that the person is incompetent.

Upon admission to the center for residential services, a client shall be informed orally and in writing of his rights under this section. If the client is a minor, or ward, his parents, guardian or guardian ad litem shall be informed orally and in writing of his rights under this section.

The following rights of a client may be denied or limited only as a part of his individual program plan for purposes of safety and health. The client or if the client is a minor or ward, his parents, guardian or guardian ad litem shall be informed in writing and orally of the grounds for the denial or limitation. The grounds for denial or limitation shall be entered in the individual program plan:

The right to send and receive unopened mail;

The right to choose and wear his own clothing;

The right to keep and use his own personal possessions including his toilet articles;

The right to keep and spend his own money;

The right to be free from physical restraints and chemical restraints that substitute for active treatment or behavior modification programs, except in emergency situations as necessary to protect the client or others;

The right to privacy in matters such as toileting and bathing;

The right to make and receive telephone calls;

The right to receive visitors daily;

The right to an appropriate personal space that provides privacy and personal safety;

The right to be free from abuse;

The right to vote;

The right to choose where and with whom to live;

The right to present grievances and complaints or to request changes in policies and services without restraint, interference, coercion, discrimination or reprisal;

The right to participate or refuse to participate in religious worship;

The right to the least restrictive environment.

A client may not be denied the following rights unless the denial is authorized by a court, the client or, if the client is a minor or ward, his parent or guardian:

The right to be free from unnecessary or excessive medication;

The right to refuse to be subjected to experimental medical or psychological research without the express and informed consent of the client or his parent or guardian if he is a minor or ward. The client or his parent or guardian may consult with independent medical or psychological specialists and his attorney before consenting or refusing;

The right to refuse to be subjected to drastic treatment procedures without the express and informed consent of the client and his parent or guardian if he is a minor or ward.

and (v) Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 85, § 2.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-672; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2008, ch. 85, §§ 1, 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “center” for “training school” in (a); and rewrote (b) through (d), including the repeal of (d)(iv) and (d)(v), which pertained to the right to participate in religious worship and to send and receive sealed mail while in training school.

§ 25-5-133.
Restraint; conditions for use; strict administration of medication; prohibited uses.

Isolation or seclusion procedures in which a person is placed alone in a locked room or in an area from which the person is physically prevented from leaving are prohibited. Restraint of a client shall be used only when less restrictive measures are ineffective for the welfare of the client or others and only when necessary to ensure the immediate physical safety of the client or others. Restraint shall be used in a manner which ensures that the dignity and safety of the person restrained are protected and shall be regularly monitored by trained staff. The reason for restrictive measures shall be reported in the client’s records and shall be reviewed by the interdisciplinary team and program manager. In addition, the client’s individual program plan shall address active treatment or less restrictive measures to manage or eliminate the behaviors for which restraint was used.

Medication shall be administered to a client only pursuant to the order of a medical professional acting within the scope of his license. A record of the medication, the dosage administered, the date and the person administering the medication to each client shall be kept in each client’s treatment record. Medication shall not be used as punishment, for the convenience of staff or in quantities that interfere with a client’s treatment program.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-673; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote the section.

§ 25-5-134.
Employment of clients within institution; wages; duties; discharge for cause.

Clients who are employed within the center shall be paid a reasonable wage based upon commensurate wages under special certificate as authorized by the federal Fair Labor Standards Act at 21 U.S.C. 214(c). The program manager shall prescribe for each position a written job description with wages, benefits and job duties clearly defined. The employment relationship pursuant to this section shall be at will.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-674; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote the section.

§ 25-5-135.
Medications aides.

Any person trained and qualified as a medication aide may administer medications in basic client care situations at the center. The center shall develop curricula, certification criteria and protocols concerning administration of medications and use of medication aides. Every medication aide shall perform the duties authorized under this section under the direction of a person licensed by the laws of this state to administer medications. The direction of medication aides shall not constitute an unlawful delegation of professional duties by the licensed nurse or other professional licensed to administer medications.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 27, § 1; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “center” for “training school” and “client” for “resident.”